Illinois, session 104th, SB1775.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Food, Drug and Cosmetic Act is 5amended by changing Section 21 as follows: 6    (410 ILCS 620/21)  (from Ch. 56 1/2, par. 521)7    Sec. 21. Rulemaking; enforcement; federal regulations. 8    (a) The authority to adopt rules promulgate regulations 9for the efficient enforcement of this Act is vested in the 10Director. The Director is authorized to make the rules adopted 11regulations promulgated under this Act conform, in so far as 12practicable, with those promulgated under the Federal Act.13    (b) Hearings authorized or required by this Act shall be 14conducted by the Director or an officer, agent, or employee 15designated by the Director him.16    (c) All pesticide chemical regulations and supplements 17thereto or revisions to those regulations that are thereof 18adopted under authority of the Federal Food, Drug and Cosmetic 19Act are the pesticide chemical regulations in this State, 20except insofar as modified or rejected by rules regulations 21for finished foods adopted promulgated by the Director.22    (d) All food additive regulations and supplements thereto 23or revisions to those regulations that are thereof adopted   SB1775- 2 -LRB104 03309 BDA 13331 b1under authority of the Federal Food, Drug and Cosmetic Act are 2the food additive regulations in this State, except insofar as 3modified or rejected by rules adopted regulations promulgated 4by the Director.5    (e) All color additive regulations and supplements thereto 6or revisions to those regulations that are thereof adopted 7under authority of the Federal Food, Drug and Cosmetic Act are 8the color additive regulations in this State, except insofar 9as modified or rejected by rules adopted regulations 10promulgated by the Director.11    (f) All special dietary use regulations and supplements 12thereto or revisions to those regulations that are thereof 13adopted under authority of the Federal Food, Drug and Cosmetic 14Act are the special dietary use regulations in this State, 15except insofar as modified or rejected by rules adopted 16regulations promulgated by the Director.17    (g) All bottled water and vended water device regulations 18and supplements thereto or revisions to those regulations that 19are thereof adopted under the authority of the Federal Food, 20Drug and Cosmetic Act are the bottled water and vended water 21device regulations in this State, except insofar as modified 22or rejected by rules adopted regulations promulgated by the 23Director.24    (h) All infant formula regulations and supplements thereto 25or revisions to those regulations that are thereof adopted 26under the authority of the Federal Food, Drug and Cosmetic Act   SB1775- 3 -LRB104 03309 BDA 13331 b1are the infant formula regulations in this State, except 2insofar as modified or rejected by rules adopted regulations 3promulgated by the Director.4    (i) All food, drug, device, and cosmetic Good 5Manufacturing Practices Regulations and supplements thereto or 6revisions to those regulations that are thereof adopted under 7the authority of Federal Food, Drug and Cosmetic Act are the 8food, drug, device and cosmetic Good Manufacturing Practices 9Regulations in this State, except insofar as modified or 10rejected by rules adopted regulations promulgated by the 11Director.12    (j) A federal regulation automatically adopted pursuant to 13this Act takes effect in this State on the date it becomes 14effective as a Federal regulation. No publication or hearing 15is required. The Director shall adopt promulgate all other 16proposed rules regulations in compliance with the requirements 17of the The Illinois Administrative Procedure Act.18    (k) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a food, 19food ingredient, dietary supplement, cosmetic, or other 20consumer product shall not be considered adulterated solely 21because it contains hemp, hemp-derived cannabinoids, 22including, but not limited to, Delta-9 tetrahydrocannabinol 23(THC), Delta-8 THC, tetrahydrocannabinolic acid (THCa), or any 24hemp product, provided that the hemp used in the product 25complies with the definition of "hemp" as specified in 7 26U.S.C. 1639o.   SB1775- 4 -LRB104 03309 BDA 13331 b1(Source: P.A. 84-891.) 2    Section 10. The Industrial Hemp Act is amended by changing 3Sections 5, 10, 15, and 20 as follows: 4    (505 ILCS 89/5)5    Sec. 5. Definitions. In this Act:6    "Department" means the Department of Agriculture.7    "Director" means the Director of Agriculture.8    "Hemp" or "industrial hemp" means the plant Cannabis 9sativa L. and any part of that plant, including the seeds 10thereof and all derivatives, extracts, cannabinoids, isomers, 11acids, salts, and salts of isomers, whether growing or not, 12with a delta-9 tetrahydrocannabinol concentration of not more 13than 0.3 percent on a dry weight basis and includes any 14intermediate or finished product made or derived from 15industrial hemp.16    "Hemp product" means a product that contains hemp.17    "Hemp production plan" means a plan submitted by the 18Department to the Secretary of the United States Department of 19Agriculture pursuant to the federal Agriculture Improvement 20Act of 2018, Public Law 115-334, and consistent with the 21Domestic Hemp Production Program pursuant to 7 CFR Part 990 22wherein the Department establishes its desire to have primary 23regulatory authority over the production of hemp. 24    "Industrial hemp" means hemp or any intermediate or   SB1775- 5 -LRB104 03309 BDA 13331 b1finished product made or derived from hemp.2    "Lot" has the meaning ascribed to that term in 7 CFR 990.1. 3    "Land area" means a farm as defined in Section 1-60 of the 4Property Tax Code in this State or land or facilities under the 5control of an institution of higher education.6    "Person" means any individual, partnership, firm, 7corporation, company, society, association, the State or any 8department, agency, or subdivision thereof, or any other 9entity.10    "Process" means the conversion of raw industrial hemp 11plant material into a form that is presently legal to import 12from outside the United States under federal law.13    "THC" means delta-9 tetrahydrocannabinol.14(Source: P.A. 102-690, eff. 12-17-21.) 15    (505 ILCS 89/10)16    Sec. 10. Licenses and registration. 17    (a) No person shall cultivate industrial hemp in this 18State without a license issued by the Department. 19    (b) The application for a license shall include:20        (1) the name and address of the applicant;21        (2) a legal description of the land that contains the 22    lots where hemp is to be produced, including, to the 23    extent practicable, any geospatial locations consistent 24    with the Domestic Hemp Production Program under 7 CFR Part 25    990 the legal description of the land area, including   SB1775- 6 -LRB104 03309 BDA 13331 b1    Global Positioning System coordinates, to be used to 2    cultivate industrial hemp; and3        (3) if federal law requires a research purpose for the 4    cultivation of industrial hemp, a description of one or 5    more research purposes planned for the cultivation of 6    industrial hemp which may include the study of the growth, 7    cultivation, or marketing of industrial hemp; however, the 8    research purpose requirement shall not be construed to 9    limit the commercial sale of industrial hemp.10    (b-5) A person shall not process industrial hemp in this 11State without registering with the Department on a form 12prescribed by the Department.13    (c) The Department may determine, by rule, the duration of 14a license or registration; application, registration, and 15license fees; and the requirements for license or registration 16renewal.17(Source: P.A. 102-690, eff. 12-17-21.) 18    (505 ILCS 89/15)19    Sec. 15. Rules. 20    (a) The Department shall submit to the Secretary of the 21United States Department of Agriculture a hemp production plan 22under which the Department monitors and regulates the 23production of industrial hemp in this State. The Department 24shall adopt rules incorporating the hemp production plan, 25including application and licensing requirements.  SB1775- 7 -LRB104 03309 BDA 13331 b1    (b) The rules adopted set by the Department shall include 2annual inspections of, at a minimum, a random group of 3producers to verify that hemp is produced in compliance with 4this Act and the Domestic Hemp Production Program established 5under 7 CFR Part 990 one yearly inspection of a licensed 6industrial hemp cultivation operation and allow for additional 7unannounced inspections of a licensed industrial hemp 8cultivation operation at the Department's discretion.9    (c) The Department shall adopt rules necessary for the 10administration and enforcement of this Act in accordance with 11all applicable State and federal laws and regulations, 12including rules concerning standards and criteria for 13licensure and registration, for the payment of applicable 14fees, signage, and for forms required for the administration 15of this Act.16    (d) The Department shall adopt rules for the testing of 17the industrial hemp THC levels and for remediation or the 18disposal of plant matter exceeding lawful THC levels, 19including an option for a cultivator to retest for a minor 20violation consistent with the Domestic Hemp Production Program 21under 7 CFR Part 990. , with the retest threshold determined by 22the Department and set in rule. Those rules may provide for the 23use of seed certified to meet the THC levels mandated by this 24Act as an alternative to testing25    (e) The Department shall adopt rules for the distribution 26and retail sale of hemp products that meet all conditions   SB1775- 8 -LRB104 03309 BDA 13331 b1specified in Section 20 of this Act. 2(Source: P.A. 102-690, eff. 12-17-21.) 3    (505 ILCS 89/20)4    Sec. 20. Hemp products. 5    (a) Nothing in this Act shall alter the legality of hemp or 6hemp products that are presently legal to possess or own, 7except as otherwise provided in this Section.8    (b) Hemp products that contain cannabinoids, that are 9intended for human consumption, and that are designated for 10retail sale within Illinois must meet the following 11requirements:12        (1) The hemp used in the hemp products must comply 13    with the definition of "hemp" specified in 7 U.S.C. 1639o.14        (2) The hemp products must not contain contaminants 15    unsafe for human consumption, including, but not limited 16    to, any microbe, fungus, yeast, mildew, herbicide, 17    pesticide, fungicide, residual solvent, metal, or other 18    contaminant found in any amount that exceeds any of the 19    accepted limitations as determined by rules adopted by the 20    Department of Public Health for a food, food ingredient, 21    dietary supplement, cosmetic, or other consumer product, 22    or other limitation pursuant to the laws of this State, 23    whichever amount is less.24    (c) Hemp products that contain cannabinoids, that are 25intended for human consumption, and that are designated for   SB1775- 9 -LRB104 03309 BDA 13331 b1retail sale within Illinois must be distributed or sold in a 2container that includes:3        (1) a scannable barcode or quick response code linked 4    to a certificate of analysis prepared by an approved 5    testing laboratory prominently displaying the 6    concentration of all detectable cannabinoids in the 7    product as well as any detectable contaminants under 8    paragraph (2) of subsection (b) of this Section or rules 9    adopted under that paragraph;10        (2) the expiration date of the product;11        (3) the number of milligrams of each marketed 12    cannabinoid per serving; and13        (4) a disclaimer, which shall state: "These statements 14    have not been evaluated by the United States Food and Drug 15    Administration. This product is not intended to diagnose, 16    treat, cure, or prevent any disease.".17    (d) Hemp products that are intended for inhalation or 18ingestion and contain detectable amounts of hemp cannabinoids 19may not be sold in this State to a person who is under 21 years 20of age.21    (e) Hemp products distributed or sold in violation of this 22Section shall be considered adulterated or misbranded under 23the Illinois Food, Drug and Cosmetic Act and all other 24applicable State laws. 25(Source: P.A. 100-1091, eff. 8-26-18.)